Washington statutes.
RCW 11.76.120

Limitation on preference to mortgage or judgment. (Effective until August 1, 2024.)

The preference given in RCW 11.76.110 to a mortgage or judgment shall only extend to the proceeds of the property subject to the lien of such mortgage or judgment.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.76.120. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 172; RRS s 1542; prior: 1897 c 22 s 1; Code 1881 s 1653; 1854 p 298 s 185.]

PDFRCW 11.76.120

Limitation on preference to mortgage or judgment. (Effective August 1, 2024.)

The preference given in RCW 11.76.110 to a mortgage, deed of trust, perfected security interest, judgment lien, or other lien shall only extend to the proceeds of the property subject to the lien.

[ 2024 c 20 s 13; 1965 c 145 s 11.76.120. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 172; RRS s 1542; prior: 1897 c 22 s 1; Code 1881 s 1653; 1854 p 298 s 185.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Savings—2024 c 20: See notes following RCW 11.54.001.